North Dakota, session 69, HB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. SPECIAL EDUCATION FUNDING COMMITTEE - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall establish and provide staffing
and administrative services to a committee to study special education funding. The chairman
of legislative management may add temporary, nonvoting members to the committee, as
deemed necessary by the committee, to serve without compensation.
2. The committee may include:
a. Eight members of the legislative assembly, four members from the house of
representatives and four members from the senate, appointed by the legislative
management;
b. Two multi-unit special education directors;
c. One large school special education director;
d. One special education coordinator;
e. One superintendent of a large school;
f. One superintendent of a small or midsize school;
g. One business manager of a large school; and
h. One multi-unit special education business manager.
3. During the 2025-26 interim, the special education funding committee study must include a
comprehensive review of special education funding models, including student contracts, high-
cost students, residential placement, and reimbursement under the Medicaid program.
4. The committee shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation
necessary to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1547 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1547.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 5 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State